ru: Форма ковра/коврика: Овал; Прямоугольник; Круг; Дорожка; Полукруглый; Квадрат; Другой
de: Matten-/Teppichform: Oval; Rechteckig; Rund; Läufer; Halbkreisförmig; Quadrat; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Форма на постелка/килим: Овален; Правоъгълен; Кръгъл; Дълъг; Полукръгъл; Квадратен; Други
sl-SI: Oblika podloge/preproge: Ovalno; Pravokotno; Okrogla; Tekač; Polkrožna; Kvadratna; Drugo
th: รูปทรงเสื่อ/พรม: รูปไข่; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; ผ้าคาดโต๊ะ; ครึ่งวงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
fr: Forme du tapis: Oval; Rectangulaire; Rond; Coureur; Semi-circulaire; Carré; Autre
zh-TW: 墊子/地毯形狀: 橢圓形; 長方形; 圓頭; 信差; 半圓形; 方頭; 其他
tr: Mat / Kilim şekli: Oval; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Koşucu; Yarım daire; Kare; Diğer
zh-CN: 地垫/地毯形状: 椭圆形; 矩形; 圆头; 跑步者; 半圆形; 方形; 其他
nl: Vorm mat/tapijt: Ovaal; Rechthoekig; Rond; Loper; Halfrond; Vierkant; Andere
pt-PT: Formato de tapete: Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Caminho; Semicircular; Quadrado; Outro
pt-BR: Formato de tapete/capacho: Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Corredor; Semicircular; Quadrado; Outro
it: Forma di tappetino/tappeto: Ovale; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Lama; Semicircolare; Quadrato; Altro
pl: Kształt maty/dywanu: Owalny; Prostokątna; Runda; Ślizg; Półkolisty; Kwadrat; Pozostałe
es: Forma del tapete/alfombra: Ovalado; Rectangular; Redondo; Corredor; Semicircular; Cuadrado; Otros
el: Σχήμα χαλακιών/χαλιών: Οβάλ; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Ράνερ; Ημικυκλικό; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
fi: Mattojen muoto: Soikea; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Juoksija; Puolipyöreä; Neliömäinen; Muu
hr-HR: Oblik otirača/tepiha: Oval; Pravokutnik; Krug; Staza; Polukrug; Kvadrat; Ostalo
ko: 매트/러그 모양: 타원형; 직사각형; 라운드; 러너; 반원형; 스퀘어; 기타
en: Mat/Rug shape: Oval; Rectangular; Round; Runner; Semicircular; Square; Other
sv: Form på hallmatta/matta: Oval; Rektangulär; Rund; Löpare; Halvcirkelformig; Fyrkantig; Annat
lt-LT: Kilimėlio / kilimo forma: Ovalus; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Pailgas; Pusapvalis; Kvadratinis; Kita
ro-RO: Forma preșului/covorului: Ovală; Dreptunghiulară; Rotundă; Traversă; Semicirculară; Pătrat; Altele
vi: Hình dạng chiếu/thảm: Hình trái xoan; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Tấm trải; Hình bán nguyệt; Mũi giày vuông; Khác
hu: Szőnyeg formája: Ovális; Téglalap; Kerek; Futó; Félkör; Négyzet; Egyéb
nb: Matte-/teppeform: Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Løper; Halvsirkel; Firkantet; Annen
ja: マット/ラグ形状: 楕円形; 長方形; ラウンド; ランナー; 半円形; スクエア; その他
da: Måtte-/tæppeform: Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Løber; Halvcirkelformet; Firkant; Andet
cs: Tvar rohože/koberce: Oválný; Obdélníkový; Oválná; Běžec; Polokruhový; Čtvercová; Jiné
sk-SK: Tvar rohože/koberca: Oválny; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Behúň; Polkruhový; Hranatý; Iné